Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 5.2 The Rhode Island Works Program

40-5.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter is hereby entitled “The Rhode Island works program,” and is Rhode Island’s welfare to work program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-2.
The Rhode Island works program — Statement of purpose.

The purpose of the Rhode Island works program is to help parents who are eligible for cash assistance to support their children by preparing for, accepting, and retaining employment. It is the intent of the Rhode Island general assembly that the Rhode Island works program shall provide employment and support services along with temporary cash assistance so that parents can participate in the workforce rather than depend on public assistance to support themselves and their children.

Under this law, parents are mandated to enter into an employment plan, as a condition of eligibility for cash assistance, and unless they are found to be temporarily exempt from the work requirements, they must participate in intensive employment services at the department of labor and training as the first step in their employment plan. Because it is believed that employment is the most effective anti-poverty measure, all activities and services provided through the Rhode Island works program are designed to promote economic independence through employment and the development of employment skills and to strengthen families through parental responsibility and short-term assistance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-3.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the general assembly:

To fundamentally change the public assistance program formerly known as the family independence program in order to provide temporary financial assistance to eligible families with children while requiring the entry or reentry of the adult members of the family into the workplace with necessary supports as quickly as possible; and

To follow the policies and guidance of the federal public assistance legislation as closely as possible; and

To promote efficiencies through interdepartmental cooperation, specifically with the department of human services, the single state agency responsible for administration and implementation of this chapter. This shall include developing and implementing child support payment and enforcement, the case-management system, payment of cash assistance, issuance of food stamps, childcare subsidies, and medical assistance to eligible children and families in need.

The department shall collaborate with community agencies and other state departments to achieve the goals of this chapter. Partners may include, but are not limited to, the:

Department of labor and training, which shall provide employment and training services in accordance with this chapter;

Department of elementary and secondary education, which provides adult education and literacy programs;

Community College of Rhode Island, which provides vocational training at the postsecondary level;

Rhode Island commerce corporation, which is responsible for expansion of job opportunities in the state for low-income families with children;

Department of labor and training, which is responsible for the planning and coordination of workforce development policy and strategies in the state’s employment, education, and economic development systems;

Department of children, youth and families, which administers the child welfare services, regulates child daycare providers, and is ultimately responsible for the guardianship of children at-risk;

Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, which is responsible for expanding housing opportunities for low-income families; and

Family court, which is responsible for enforcing the support obligations of absent parents and protecting those children whose health and well-being is at risk because of an absence of family resources.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-4.
Collaboration between the department of human services and the department of labor and training.

Promoting economic independence through the Rhode Island works program.

The department of human services, through the Rhode Island works program, in collaboration with the department of labor and training, shall promote economic independence and help maintain and strengthen family life by enabling persons with dependent children to assume responsibility for their families through the dignity of work.

The department of labor and training, the lead agency responsible for employment, job training, and workforce development services for the state of Rhode Island, is hereby authorized to establish and provide intensive employment services to cash assistance recipients in accordance with state and federal law, regulation, and funding.

The intensive employment services authorized by this section shall include, but are not limited to, the provision of job skill assessment, including assessment of English literacy and numeracy, job counseling, job testing, job matching, supervised job search, job development, and job-readiness services beyond those currently available through federal authority. Through the intensive employment services, the department shall identify physical and mental challenges that indicate the participant should be referred to the office of rehabilitation services (ORS) for development of a rehabilitation employment plan and/or that require accommodations in securing employment. The intensive employment services shall also include an employer outreach program to encourage the employment of Rhode Island works program participants in the private sector and to disseminate information regarding both federal and state tax credit programs for which public assistance recipients are eligible.

The intensive employment services shall help participants identify strengths, barriers, and employment opportunities taking into account the participant’s work readiness and employment history, as well as vocational training that can increase the participant’s earning ability. The department of labor and training shall provide personnel qualified to manage and oversee structured job-search activities of program participants that result in employment, including part-time, at or above the state minimum wage, as quickly as possible, and/or within the time frames permissible under federal guidelines applicable to the works program cash assistance program.

Intensive employment services shall be delivered jointly through co-location of staff from the department of labor and training and the department of human services, with primary activities being provided throughout the state’s one-stop career centers. Where the centers are not accessible to Rhode Island works program participants, the department of labor and training and the department of human services shall work in collaboration to identify alternative sites.

The department of human services and the department of labor and training are hereby authorized to operate or contract for work-readiness activities and intensive work-readiness activities for those individuals whose employment plan includes participation in such activities. Work-readiness activities are of limited duration, and are designed to help prepare participants for work by assuring that participants are familiar with general workplace expectations and exhibit work behavior and attitudes necessary to compete successfully in the labor market. To the extent practicable, work-readiness activities should involve supervised community work experience or unpaid work experiences in the private sector. Intensive work-readiness services include activities that are designed to prepare participants who have limited literacy and work history with the minimum skills necessary to achieve entry-level employment.

The department of labor and training and the department of human services may collaborate on the delivery of short-term training vouchers for parents/participants approved for the service; the development of unpaid work experience and community service programs; and the oversight of any performance-based work programs that are subcontracted to meet the special needs of hard-to-employ parents/participants who receive temporary cash assistance under this chapter.

If during intensive employment services, a parent/participant in the program is assessed as being more likely to succeed in competitive employment if first provided a short-term intensive intervention, the department of human services and the department of labor and training staff may jointly define next steps.

The Rhode Island department of labor and training shall continuously survey employers in the state to identify employment positions for persons eligible for family assistance.

The department of human services and the department of labor and training shall establish performance standards for the intensive employment services available through the works program to ensure that the goals of this act are met and that the state meets the federal work participation requirements.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-5.
Rhode Island works — Promotion of work.

The department of human services and the department of labor and training shall promote work by:

Providing assessments, intensive employment services, support services, and transitional cash assistance with the expectation that participants in the works program move quickly towards employment.

Developing stronger employment skills that will lead to self-sufficiency to establish long-term attachment to the workforce.

Recognizing the equal responsibility of both parents to provide economic support for their children.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-6.
Goals.

The Rhode Island works program shall strive to:

Eliminate or reduce the harmful effects of poverty on families and children by fostering employment and opportunity as a means to economic independence;

Assist participants to gain employment as rapidly as possible, giving due consideration to individual circumstances, labor market conditions, the needs of the dependent children for continuing care and protection, and the ultimate goal of long-term economic independence;

Eliminate the stigma of welfare by promoting a philosophy and a perception that the purpose of welfare is to eliminate or reduce the harmful effects of poverty on families and children by promoting work opportunities for all Rhode Island residents;

Support and coordinate with activities that promote self-sufficiency and strengthen family life;

Provide a comprehensive support service package that includes: child support, medical assistance, food stamps, child care, transportation, and other support services necessary to promote economic independence;

Promote successful transition from public assistance to employment and reduce the likelihood that participants will need to return to cash assistance through the provision of job-readiness activities, employment-related skills training, and education activities concurrently with or as necessary, prior to employment or seeking employment, family support skills, and follow-up services for problem resolution and job advancement;

Develop partnerships through the joint efforts of the department of labor and training and the department of human services with employers to create job opportunities and meet the needs of both employers and participants;

Develop partnerships with the office of adult education to provide full-time intensive work-readiness services to participants with limited literacy and work experience as well as part-time adult education services that are accessible to working participants so they can increase their earning ability;

Provide a program where it is more advantageous to work than not to work by rewarding self-sufficiency; and

Implement a program that is clear, focused, and simple to administer.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-7.
Work participation rates.

The director of the department of human services and the director of the department of labor and training, to the extent that federal/Temporary Assistance to Needy Families (TANF) funds are made available, shall commit their department resources and focused efforts to meet the federal TANF work participation rate requirements.

In the event that there are changes in the federal TANF program, the department of human services shall seek support through the general assembly to make all necessary changes and shall take all necessary steps to comply with the federal law.

The works program cash assistance program administered according to this chapter is designed to meet or exceed the minimum federal TANF required participation rate for all families.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-8.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms having the meanings set forth herein, unless the context in which such terms are used clearly indicates to the contrary:

“Applicant” means a person who has filed a written application for assistance for herself or himself and her or his dependent child(ren). An applicant may be a parent or non-parent caretaker relative.

“Assistance” means cash and any other benefits provided pursuant to this chapter.

“Assistance unit” means the assistance-filing unit consisting of the group of persons, including the dependent child(ren), living together in a single household who must be included in the application for assistance and in the assistance payment if eligibility is established. An assistance unit may be the same as a family.

“Benefits” shall mean assistance received pursuant to this chapter.

“Community service programs” means structured programs and activities in which cash assistance recipients perform work for the direct benefit of the community under the auspices of public or nonprofit organizations. Community service programs are designed to improve the employability of recipients not otherwise able to obtain paid employment.

“Department” means the department of human services.

“Dependent child” means an individual, other than an individual with respect to whom foster care maintenance payments are made, who is: (i) Under the age of eighteen (18); or (ii) Under the age of nineteen (19) and a full-time student in a secondary school (or in the equivalent level of vocational or educational training).

“Director” means the director of the department of human services.

“Earned income” means income in cash or the equivalent received by a person through the receipt of wages, salary, commissions, or profit from activities in which the person is self-employed or as an employee and before any deductions for taxes.

“Earned income tax credit” means the credit against federal personal income tax liability under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 32, or any successor section, the advanced payment of the earned income tax credit to an employee under § 3507 of the code, 26 U.S.C. § 3507 [repealed], or any successor section and any refund received as a result of the earned income tax credit, as well as any refundable state earned income tax credit.

“Education directly related to employment” means education, in the case of a participant who has not received a high school diploma or a certificate of high school equivalency, related to a specific occupation, job, or job offer.

“Family” means: (i) A pregnant woman from and including the seventh month of her pregnancy; or (ii) A child and the following eligible persons living in the same household as the child: (iii) Each biological, adoptive or stepparent of the child, or in the absence of a parent, any adult relative who is responsible, in fact, for the care of such child; and (iv) The child’s minor siblings (whether of the whole or half blood); provided, however, that the term “family” shall not include any person receiving benefits under Title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq. A family may be the same as the assistance unit.

“Gross earnings” means earnings from employment and self-employment further described in the department of human services rules and regulations.

“Individual employment plan” means a written, individualized plan for employment developed jointly by the applicant and the department of human services that specifies the steps the participant shall take toward long-term economic independence developed in accordance with §

40-5.2-10(e)

. A participant must comply with the terms of the individual employment plan as a condition of eligibility in accordance with §

40-5.2-10(e)

.

“Job search and job readiness” means the mandatory act of seeking or obtaining employment by the participant, or the preparation to seek or obtain employment.

In accord with federal requirements, job search activities must be supervised by the department of labor and training and must be reported to the department of human services in accordance with TANF work verification requirements.

Except in the context of rehabilitation employment plans, and special services provided by the department of children, youth and families, job-search and job-readiness activities are limited to four (4) consecutive weeks, or for a total of six (6) weeks in a twelve-month (12) period, with limited exceptions as defined by the department. The department of human services, in consultation with the department of labor and training, shall extend job-search, and job-readiness assistance for up to twelve (12) weeks in a fiscal year if a state has an unemployment rate at least fifty percent (50%) greater than the United States unemployment rate if the state meets the definition of a “needy state” under the contingency fund provisions of federal law.

Preparation to seek employment, or job readiness, may include, but may not be limited to: the participant obtaining life-skills training; homelessness services; domestic violence services; special services for families provided by the department of children, youth and families; substance abuse treatment; mental health treatment; or rehabilitation activities as appropriate for those who are otherwise employable. The services, treatment, or therapy must be determined to be necessary and certified by a qualified medical or mental health professional. Intensive work-readiness services may include: work-based literacy; numeracy; hands-on training; work experience; and case management services. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to mean that the department of labor and training shall be the sole provider of job-readiness activities described herein.

“Job skills training directly related to employment” means training or education for job skills required by an employer to provide an individual with the ability to obtain employment or to advance or adapt to the changing demands of the workplace. Job skills training directly related to employment must be supervised on an ongoing basis.

“Minor parent” means a parent under the age of eighteen (18). A minor parent may be an applicant or recipient with his or her dependent child(ren) in his or her own case or a member of an assistance unit with his or her dependent child(ren) in a case established by the minor parent’s parent.

“Net income” means the total gross income of the assistance unit less allowable disregards and deductions as described in §

40-5.2-10(g)

.

“On-the-job training” means training in the public or private sector that is given to a paid employee while he or she is engaged in productive work and that provides knowledge and skills essential to the full and adequate performance of the job. On-the-job training must be supervised by an employer, work-site sponsor, or other designee of the department of human services on an ongoing basis.

“Participant” means a person who has been found eligible for assistance in accordance with this chapter and who must comply with all requirements of this chapter, and has entered into an individual employment plan. A participant may be a parent or non-parent caretaker relative included in the cash assistance payment.

“Recipient” means a person who has been found eligible and receives cash assistance in accordance with this chapter.

“Relative” means a parent, stepparent, grandparent, great grandparent, great-great grandparent, aunt, great-aunt, great-great aunt, uncle, great-uncle, great-great uncle, sister, brother, stepbrother, stepsister, half-brother, half-sister, first cousin, first cousin once removed, niece, great-niece, great-great niece, nephew, great-nephew, or great-great nephew.

“Resident” means a person who maintains residence by his or her continuous physical presence in the state.

“Self-employment income” means the total profit from a business enterprise, farming, etc., resulting from a comparison of the gross receipts with the business expenses, i.e., expenses directly related to producing the goods or services and without which the goods or services could not be produced. However, items such as depreciation, personal business and entertainment expenses, and personal transportation are not considered business expenses for the purposes of determining eligibility for cash assistance in accordance with this chapter.

“State” means the state of Rhode Island.

“Subsidized employment” means employment in the private or public sectors for which the employer receives a subsidy from TANF or other public funds to offset some or all of the wages and costs of employing a recipient. It includes work in which all or a portion of the wages paid to the recipient are provided to the employer either as a reimbursement for the extra costs of training or as an incentive to hire the recipient, including, but not limited to, grant diversion.

“Subsidized housing” means housing for a family whose rent is restricted to a percentage of its income.

“Unsubsidized employment” means full- or part-time employment in the public or private sector that is not subsidized by TANF or any other public program.

“Vocational educational training” means organized educational programs, not to exceed twelve (12) months with respect to any participant, that are directly related to the preparation of participants for employment in current or emerging occupations. Vocational educational training must be supervised.

“Work activities” mean the specific work requirements that must be defined in the individual employment plan and must be complied with by the participant as a condition of eligibility for the receipt of cash assistance for single and two-family (2) households outlined in §

40-5.2-12

.

“Work experience” means a work activity that provides a participant with an opportunity to acquire the general skills, training, knowledge, and work habits necessary to obtain employment. The purpose of work experience is to improve the employability of those who cannot find unsubsidized employment. An employer, work site sponsor, and/or other appropriate designee of the department must supervise this activity.

“Work supplementation,” also known as “grant diversion,” means the use of all or a portion of a participant’s cash assistance grant and food stamp grant as a wage supplement to an employer. The supplement shall be limited to a maximum period of twelve (12) months. An employer must agree to continue the employment of the participant as part of the regular work force, beyond the supplement period, if the participant demonstrates satisfactory performance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 13, § 6, effective July 6, 2021.

40-5.2-9.
The Rhode Island works program — General eligibility requirements.

All families who wish to make application to the department of human services for assistance under this chapter shall have the opportunity to do so.

Cash assistance shall be provided to eligible needy families only with dependent children who meet all the requirements of this chapter.

Eligibility for benefits provided in accordance with this chapter is determined on a family or assistance unit basis.

The following persons shall be included in the assistance unit, unless the person receives state supplemental assistance or supplemental security benefits under Title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., if living in the same household with any dependent child: all minor blood-related, step, or adoptive brothers and sisters, and all natural, step, or adoptive parents of the children, including cohabitating adults who share a minor child.

A minor parent may be in the assistance unit that may also include all natural, step, or adoptive parents of the minor parent and all minor blood-related, step or adoptive brothers and sisters.

If the parents are not residing together, a child shall be considered residing with the parent who has physical custody of the child the majority of the time. If the child resides with the parents in their separate households equal time, the parent who applies for assistance for that child first in time shall be the eligible parent.

Each person in the assistance unit shall develop all potential sources of income for which the person may be eligible. Each person shall apply for the income, cooperate in applying for the income, and accept the income if eligible.

Eligibility for cash assistance exists if the assistance unit’s net income is less than the payment standard for the assistance group size.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.